Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Destroyed homestead” means a homestead  that was destroyed by wildfire between
September 1, 2020, and September 30, 2020, in a county included in the  geographical area
covered by a state of emergency declared in response to the wildfire.
(b) “Eligible property” means a rebuilt homestead to the extent that the total  square
footage of the rebuilt  homestead does not exceed the total square footage of the destroyed
homestead that the rebuilt homestead replaces.
(c) “Homestead” has the meaning given that term in ORS 311.666.
(d) “Rebuilt  homestead” means a homestead that is constructed to replace a destroyed
homestead by the same owner on the same lot.
(2)(a) The governing body of a county may elect by ordinance or resolution to allow eli-
gible property to be assessed and taxed in accordance with this section.
(b) The ordinance or resolution may:
(A) Prescribe the methods by which the assessor administers this  section, including, but
not limited to, how claims are made; and
(B) Impose a  fee on the owner of the rebuilt homestead for the actual cost to the county
of recording the notice under subsection (8)(b) of this section.
(3)(a) Eligible property may be granted a specially assessed value  that equals the real
market value of the destroyed homestead as shown on the  tax statement delivered pursuant
to ORS 311.250 for the property tax year that began on July 1, 2020.
(b) For the first property tax year for which eligible property is assessed  under this
section, the  eligible property’s maximum specially assessed value shall equal the product of
the specially assessed value multiplied by the ratio, not  greater than 1.00, of the maximum
assessed value the eligible property would have had for the applicable property tax year if it
were not specially assessed to the real market value of the eligible property for the applicable
property tax year.
(c) For each year after the first property tax year for which the eligible property is spe-
cially assessed under  this section and before disqualification from the specially assessed
value, the maximum specially assessed value shall equal the greater of 103 percent  of the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-A) Page 1
eligible property’s assessed value from the prior  property tax year or 100 percent of the eli-
gible property’s maximum specially assessed value from the prior property tax year.
(d) Property within the same  property tax account that is not eligible property shall be
assessed and taxed as other property similarly situated is assessed and taxed.
(e) For purposes of this section, square footage shall be  determined by the assessor of
the county in which the rebuilt homestead is located.
(4) The assessed value of the eligible property for any property tax  year during which the
eligible property is granted a specially assessed value under this section  shall be the least
of:
(a) The eligible property’s maximum  specially assessed value as determined under sub-
section (3) of this section;
(b) The eligible property’s real market value; or
(c) The eligible property’s  specially assessed value as determined under subsection (3) of
this section.
(5) A  specially assessed value may be claimed for property tax years beginning on or after
July 1, 2021.
(6) A claim for a specially assessed value for property under this section must:
(a) Be in writing on a form supplied by the Department of Revenue;
(b) Describe both the destroyed homestead and the rebuilt homestead;
(c) Recite all facts establishing the eligibility of the rebuilt homestead for the  specially
assessed value; and
(d) Have attached:
(A) Any information or documentation required by the department; and
(B) A written declaration by the applicant, subject to penalties for false swearing, that
the statements contained in the claim are true.
(7)(a)(A) A claim for an initial  year of specially assessed value must be filed with the
assessor of  the county in which the rebuilt homestead is located after January 1 and on or
before April 1 immediately preceding the first property tax year  for which the specially as-
sessed value is claimed.
(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph  (A) of this paragraph, a claim for an initial year of
specially assessed value for the property tax years beginning on July 1, 2021, July 1, 2022,
July 1, 2023, or July 1, 2024, must be filed no later than December 31, 2025.
(b) For each subsequent property tax year  for which the specially assessed value is
claimed, the owner of the rebuilt homestead must file an attestation, under penalties for
false swearing, that the owner will continue to occupy the rebuilt homestead as the  owner’s
principal dwelling for the entirety of the property tax year.
(8)(a) If all or any part of the rebuilt homestead is determined to  be eligible property, a
timely claim for the specially assessed value has the effect  of requiring the county assessor
to determine the total amount of taxes due on the eligible property  in accordance with this
section until the property tax year determined under subsection (9) of this section.
(b) Each year that eligible property is granted  a specially assessed value under this sec-
tion, the county  assessor shall enter on the assessment and tax roll that the eligible property
is specially assessed and is subject to potential additional taxes by adding the notation “po-
tential additional taxes.”
(9) Eligible property shall be assessed and taxed as other property  similarly situated is
assessed and taxed beginning with the property tax year that immediately succeeds the ear-
liest of:
(a) The date on which the rebuilt homestead is  no longer occupied by the owner as a
homestead, except when the owner is required to be absent by  reason of health or active
military service;
(b) The date on which the rebuilt homestead is rented to another person for  any dura-
tion; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-A) Page 2
(c) The date on which the rebuilt homestead is transferred to new ownership.
(10) If  the grant of a specially assessed value under this section results in an overpay-
ment of taxes paid, the amount of the overpayment shall be refunded in  the manner pre-
scribed in ORS 311.806.
(11) Any individual aggrieved by the denial of a claim for a specially assessed value  under
this section  may appeal to the Oregon Tax Court in the manner provided under ORS 305.404
to 305.560.
(12) Property other than eligible property  that is added to the property tax account of
the rebuilt homestead during the period of specially assessed value shall be considered to  be
new property or new improvements to property under ORS 308.153 for the assessment year
in which the added property is first taken into account.
(13) If the governing body of a county adopts an ordinance or resolution  that amends or
ends the specially assessed value in the county, eligible  property that has been granted a
specially assessed value under this section before the effective date  of the ordinance or re-
solution shall continue to receive the  specially assessed value on the same terms in effect
when the specially assessed value was first  granted until a circumstance listed in subsection
(9) of this section occurs.
(14) The specially assessed value available under this section is  in addition to and not in
lieu of any other property tax limit, exemption or  partial exemption, special assessment or
deferral.
(15) ORS 315.037 does not apply to this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 310.165 is amended to read:
310.165. (1) For any unit of property partially exempt from tax under ORS 307.250, 307.370  or
308.459 or any other law, the assessor shall determine the maximum amount of taxes on property
to be imposed on such unit of property under ORS 310.150, by  using the lesser of the real market
value or the taxable value of the unit of property after the exemption has been applied.
(2) For any unit of  property that is specially assessed for ad valorem tax purposes under ORS
308A.050 to 308A.128, 308A.250 to 308A.259, 308A.315, 321.257  to 321.390, 321.700 to 321.754, 321.805
to 321.855 or 358.480 to 358.545 or section 1 of this 2024 Act , the assessor shall determine  the
maximum amount of taxes on property to be imposed on such property under ORS 310.150 by using
the lesser of the real market value or the specially assessed value of the property.
(3) In the  case of any unit of property of which a part of the unit is exempt from taxation, and
that part may be identified  both as to value and physical description, the real market value of the
unit shall not include the value of the exempt part of the unit.
(4) This  subsection applies to any unit of property described in subsection (1) or (2) of this sec-
tion for  which the maximum amount of taxes imposed has been determined under this section. If the
unit of property  is subject to imposition of additional taxes due to disqualification from special as-
sessment or partial exemption, the determination of the maximum amount of additional taxes  that
may be imposed due to disqualification shall be made on the basis of the real market  value of the
property for the year to which the additional taxes relate.
SECTION 3.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate March 1, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1545 (SB 1545-A) Page 4